Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-208
Insurance companies; stock distribution and sale; compensation; limitation; statement.

No domestic insurance company shall issue, cause, or allow to be issued any stock or stock subscriptions at any time upon which all expenses of distribution and sale, including promotion, commissions, and underwriting fees, exceed ten percent of the amount paid in money upon such stock or stock subscriptions. All persons incorporating a stock insurance company shall sign a statement before a notary public stating that no one person or group of persons shall receive directly or indirectly any money or securities whatsoever for promoting and organizing any such company in excess of that amount provided for in the insurance laws of this state pertaining to the promotion and organization of insurance companies, and such statement shall be filed in the office of the Department of Insurance.

Laws 1921, c. 305, § 1, p. 963;

C.S.1922, § 7817;

C.S.1929, § 44-404;

R.S.1943, § 44-208;

Laws 1989, LB 92, § 49.